Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.271

Violations of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271—Schedule of penalties—Appeal.

(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to employ an individual for purposes of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 who has not been issued a certificate of competency, a temporary permit, or a training certificate. It is unlawful for any individual to engage in the electrical construction trade or to maintain or install any electrical equipment or conductors without having in his or her possession a certificate of competency, a temporary permit, or a training certificate under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271, and photo identification. The department may establish by rule a requirement that the individual also wear and visibly display his or her certificate or permit.

(2) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity found in violation of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than five hundred dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. An appeal may be made to the board as is provided in RCW 19.28.131. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after the notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. Any equipment maintained or installed by any person who does not possess a certificate of competency under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not receive an electrical work permit and electrical service shall not be connected or maintained to operate the equipment. Each day that a person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violates RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 is a separate violation.

(3) A civil penalty shall be collected in a civil action brought by the attorney general in the county wherein the alleged violation arose at the request of the department if any of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rules adopted under RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 are violated.

[ 2011 c 301 s 7; 2009 c 36 s 6; 2001 c 211 s 20; 1996 c 147 s 9; 1988 c 81 s 16; 1986 c 156 s 17; 1983 c 206 s 22; 1980 c 30 s 13. Formerly RCW 19.28.620.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.